Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.010

Certificate required.

(1) No person may represent himself or herself as a court reporter without first obtaining a certificate as required by this chapter.

(2) A person represents himself or herself to be a court reporter when the person adopts or uses any title or description of services that incorporates one or more of the following terms: "Shorthand reporter," "court reporter," "certified shorthand reporter," or "certified court reporter."

[ 2000 c 171 s 31; 1989 c 382 s 2.]